Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2613
Sales of swine; packer; reporting requirements.

Beginning February 15, 2000, a packer shall, two times each day during which swine are purchased, report to the department and to the United States Department of Agriculture, agricultural market service livestock news branch, all swine that are purchased in the cash, spot, or direct market since the last report. A packer shall, one time each day during which swine are purchased, report to the department and to the United States Department of Agriculture, agricultural market service livestock news branch, all swine that are purchased by contract that day. Such reports shall be completed on forms prepared by the department, in consultation with the agricultural market service livestock news branch, and shall include:

(1) The cash price paid and the number of swine purchased in the cash, spot, or direct market at price intervals representative of the day's trade;

(2) The base price paid and premium and discount payment adjustments for quality characteristics including grade, yield, and backfat;

(3) Base price and premium and discount factors for swine purchased using a formula-based pricing system; and

(4) The number of swine purchased under contract, in which the date of delivery is set for more than fourteen days after the making of the contract, and the base price to be paid or the formula that will be used to determine the base price to be paid.

The report shall not include information regarding the identity of a seller.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 13.